Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-644
Local control; annexation; effect.

If a city or village which has exercised its authority under section 9-643 to prohibit lotteries within its boundaries annexes any area in which a lottery is being lawfully conducted by a county, the county may continue the lottery for a period not to exceed the shorter of (1) the remainder of the term of the county's agreement with the lottery operator or (2) two years. The lottery shall be subject to all taxes, regulations, and controls imposed by the city or village under such section, whether imposed before or after annexation.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 84.